Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1714XS (4) 91 lh/ko S.F. 556 Section 1. SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION PROGRAM FOR 1 WOMEN, INFANTS, AND CHILDREN ELIGIBILITY ââ PREGNANCY, 2 POSTPARTUM, AND INFANTS. 3 1. On or before August 1, 2025, the department of health and 4 human services shall submit a request to the food and nutrition 5 service of the United States department of agriculture for 6 approval of a waiver for purposes of the state administration 7 of the special supplemental nutrition program for women, 8 infants, and children, to provide the following: 9 a. Continuous eligibility during a womanâs pregnancy for a 10 pregnant woman whose family income is at or below three hundred 11 seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level for the 12 household size. 13 b. Twelve months of continuous postpartum eligibility for 14 a postpartum woman whose family income is at or below three 15 hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level for 16 the household size. 17 c. Twelve months of continuous eligibility from the date of 18 an infantâs birth for an infant whose family income is at or 19 below three hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty 20 level for the household size. 21 2. The department of health and human services shall 22 implement the waiver no fewer than thirty calendar days from 23 the date of receipt of federal approval. 24 3. If the food and nutrition service of the United States 25 department of agriculture fails to approve the waiver, the 26 department of health and human services shall submit a report 27 to the general assembly on or before December 31, 2025, 28 containing the cost of the department providing the following: 29 a. Continuous eligibility during a womanâs pregnancy under 30 the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, 31 and children for a pregnant woman whose family income is at or 32 below three hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty 33 level for the household size. 34 b. Twelve months of continuous postpartum eligibility under 35 -1- LSB 1714XS (4) 91 lh/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 556 the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, 1 and children for a postpartum woman whose family income is at 2 or below three hundred seventy-five percent of the federal 3 poverty level for the household size. 4 c. Twelve months of continuous eligibility from the date 5 of an infantâs birth under the special supplemental nutrition 6 program for women, infants, and children for an infant whose 7 family income is at or below three hundred seventy-five percent 8 of the federal poverty level for the household size. 9 Sec. 2. SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION PROGRAM FOR WOMEN, 10 INFANTS, AND CHILDREN ââ STATE-FUNDED ELIGIBILITY. The 11 department of health and human services shall expand 12 eligibility under the special supplemental nutrition program 13 for women by providing the following: 14 1. Continuous eligibility during a womanâs pregnancy for a 15 pregnant woman whose family income is at or below three hundred 16 seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level for the 17 household size. 18 2. Twelve months of continuous postpartum eligibility for 19 a postpartum woman whose family income is at or below three 20 hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level for 21 the household size. 22 3. Twelve months of continuous eligibility from the date of 23 an infantâs birth for an infant whose family income is at or 24 below three hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty 25 level for the household size. 26 Sec. 3. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. If the food and 27 nutrition service of the United States department of 28 agriculture fails to approve the waiver to expand eligibility 29 for pregnant women, postpartum women, and infants under the 30 special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and 31 children, and the general assembly appropriates moneys to the 32 department of health and human services for the purpose of 33 expanding eligibility for pregnant women, postpartum women, and 34 infants under the special supplemental nutrition program for 35 -2- LSB 1714XS (4) 91 lh/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 556 women, infants, and children, the following takes effect on 1 July 1, 2026: 2 The section of this Act requiring the department of 3 health and human services to provide expanded eligibility 4 for pregnant women, postpartum women, and infants under the 5 special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and 6 children. 7